Wisconsin, session 2025, AB835.
do enact as follows:AB835,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB835,28Section 2. 20.235 (1) (cd) of the statutes is created to read:AB835,2,10920.235 (1) (cd) Grants for students enrolled in teacher education programs. 10The amounts in the schedule for grants under s. 39.52 (2).AB835,311Section 3. 20.255 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB835,2,161220.255 (2) (b) Aids for special education and school age parents programs. The 13amounts in the schedule A sum sufficient for the payment of the full cost of special 14education for children in hospitals and convalescent homes under s. 115.88 (4) and 15for the payment of aids for special education and school age parents programs 16under ss. 115.88, 115.93 and 118.255 as provided under s. 115.882.AB835,417Section 4. 39.52 of the statutes is created to read:AB835,2,191839.52 Grants for students enrolled in teacher education programs. 19(1) In this section:AB835,2,2220(a) “Institution of higher education” means an institution of higher education, 21as defined in s. 39.53 (1), that offers a teacher preparatory program approved under 22s. 115.28 (7) (a).AB835,3,11(b) “Tribal school” has the meaning given in s. 115.001 (15m).AB835,3,42(2) (a) Subject to par. (b) and sub. (3), from the appropriation under s. 20.235 3(1) (cd), the board may award grants to students enrolled in the teacher preparatory 4program of an institution of higher education to pay for any of the following:AB835,3,551. Tuition and fees charged by the institution of higher education.AB835,3,762. Any expense incurred in connection with obtaining a license to teach issued 7by the department of public instruction, including any examination or licensing fee.AB835,3,118(b) The amount of a grant awarded under par. (a) for the payment of tuition 9and fees may not exceed the amount of academic fees plus segregated fees charged 10to a resident undergraduate student at the University of Wisconsin-Madison 11enrolled in an equivalent program for an equivalent term.AB835,3,1512(3) The board may not award a grant under sub. (2) (a) to a student unless the 13student enters into a written agreement in which the student commits to working 14in this state as a teacher in a public or private elementary or secondary school or 15tribal school for at least 4 years after the student receives a bachelor’s degree.AB835,516Section 5. 115.882 of the statutes is amended to read:AB835,3,2317115.882 Payment of state aid; reimbursement rate. Funds appropriated 18under s. 20.255 (2) (b) shall be used first for the purpose of s. 115.88 (4). Costs In 19the 2025-26 school year and in each school year thereafter, costs eligible for 20reimbursement from the appropriation under s. 20.255 (2) (b) under ss. 115.88 (1m) 21to (3), (6), and (8), 115.93, and 118.255 (4) shall be reimbursed at a rate set to 22distribute the full amount appropriated for reimbursement for the costs, not to 23exceed 100 percent 90 percent of eligible costs.AB835,61Section 6. 121.905 (3) (c) 6. of the statutes is amended to read:AB835,4,42121.905 (3) (c) 6. For the limit for each of the 2015-16 to 2018-19 school years, 3for the 2021-22 school year, and for any the 2022-23 school year thereafter, make no 4adjustment to the result under par. (b).AB835,75Section 7. 121.905 (3) (c) 9. of the statutes is amended to read:AB835,4,76121.905 (3) (c) 9. For the limit for 2023-2425 the 2024-25 to 2025-26 school 7years, add $325 to the result under par. (b).AB835,88Section 8. 121.905 (3) (c) 10. of the statutes is created to read:AB835,4,119121.905 (3) (c) 10. For the limit for the 2026-27 school year and any school 10year thereafter, add the result under s. 121.91 (2m) (k) 2. to the result under par. 11(b).AB835,912Section 9. 121.91 (2m) (i) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB835,4,1613121.91 (2m) (i) (intro.) Except as provided in subs. (3), (4), and (8), no school 14district may increase its revenues for any of the 2015-16 to 2025-26 school year or 15for any school year thereafter years to an amount that exceeds the amount 16calculated as follows:AB835,1017Section 10. 121.91 (2m) (j) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB835,4,2118121.91 (2m) (j) (intro.) Notwithstanding par. (i) and except as provided in 19subs. (3), (4), and (8), a school district cannot increase its revenues for each of the 202020-21 school year-year 2425 to 2025-26 school years to an amount that exceeds 21the amount calculated as follows:AB835,1122Section 11. 121.91 (2m) (j) 2m. of the statutes is amended to read:AB835,4,2323121.91 (2m) (j) 2m. In the 2023-2425 24 to 2025-26 school years, add $146.AB835,121Section 12. 121.91 (2m) (k) of the statutes is created to read:AB835,5,42121.91 (2m) (k) Except as provided in subs. (3), (4), and (8), no school district 3may increase its revenues for the 2026-27 school year or for any school year 4thereafter to an amount that exceeds the amount calculated as follows:AB835,5,951. Divide the sum of the amount of state aid received in the previous school 6year and property taxes levied for the previous school year, excluding property 7taxes levied for the purpose of s. 120.13 (19) and excluding funds described under 8sub. (4) (c), by the average of the number of pupils enrolled in the 3 previous school 9years.AB835,5,12102. Multiply the amount of the revenue increase per pupil allowed under this 11subsection for the previous school year by the sum of 1.0 plus the allowable rate of 12increase under s. 73.0305 expressed as a decimal.AB835,5,13133. Add the result under subd. 1. to the result under subd. 2.AB835,5,15144. Multiply the result under subd. 3. by the average of the number of pupils 15enrolled in the current and the 2 preceding school years.AB835,1316Section 13. 121.91 (2m) (r) 1. (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB835,5,2017121.91 (2m) (r) 1. (intro.) Notwithstanding pars. (i) to (j) par. (k), if a school 18district is created under s. 117.105, its revenue limit under this section for the 19school year beginning with the effective date of the reorganization shall be 20determined as follows except as provided under subs. (3) and (4):AB835,1421Section 14. 121.91 (2m) (r) 1. b. of the statutes is amended to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab835 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab835 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB835 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB835 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB835: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting